th: ฟังก์ชันการวินิจฉัยที่รองรับ: การวินิจฉัย ABS; ทดสอบแบตเตอรี่/ระบบชาร์จ; ทดสอบแบบสองทิศทาง/แอคทีฟ; ล้างรหัส (DTC); การฟื้นฟู DPF; บริการ/รีเซ็ต EPB; ทดสอบระบบ EVAP; ข้อมูลภาพนิ่ง (Freeze frame); จอภาพตรวจสอบความพร้อม I/M; การเข้ารหัสหัวฉีด; สตรีมข้อมูลสด/ข้อมูลเรียลไทม์; ทดสอบเซ็นเซอร์ O2; รีเซ็ตน้ำมันเครื่อง; ทดสอบการมอนิเตอร์ในรถ (โหมด 6); อ่านรหัส (DTC); การวินิจฉัยระบบถุงลมนิรภัย (SRS); การปรับเทียบมุมเลี้ยว (SAS); รีเซ็ต/เรียนรู้ค่า TPMS; การเรียนรู้ค่าลิ้นปีกผีเสื้อใหม่; การวินิจฉัยระบบเกียร์; อื่นๆ
ru: Поддерживаемые диагностические функции: Диагностика ABS; Проверка АКБ/системы зарядки; Двунаправленные/активные тесты; Удаление кодов неисправностей (DTC); Регенерация DPF; Обслуживание/сброс EPB; Проверка системы EVAP; Данные стоп-кадра; Мониторы готовности I/M; Кодирование форсунок; Поток данных в реальном времени; Проверка датчика O2; Сброс интервала замены масла; Тест бортового мониторинга (Режим 6); Чтение кодов неисправностей (DTC); Диагностика SRS/подушек безопасности; Калибровка угла поворота рулевого колеса (SAS); Сброс/программирование TPMS; Адаптация дроссельной заслонки; Диагностика трансмиссии; Другое
nl: Ondersteunde diagnostische functies: ABS-diagnostiek; Accu-/laadsysteemtest; Bidirectionele/actieve tests; Codes wissen (DTC); DPF-regeneratie; EPB-service/reset; EVAP-systeemtest; Freeze-frame-gegevens; I/M readiness monitors; Injectorcodering; Livegegevens/realtime gegevensstroom; O2-sensortest; Oliereset; On-board monitoringtest (modus 6); Codes lezen (DTC); SRS-/airbagdiagnostiek; Stuurhoekkalibratie (SAS); TPMS resetten/inleren; Gasklep inleren; Transmissiediagnostiek; Overige
fi: Tuetut vikakooditoiminnot: ABS-diagnostiikka; Akun/latausjärjestelmän testi; Kaksisuuntaiset/aktiiviset testit; Vikakoodien (DTC) tyhjennys; DPF:n regenerointi; EPB-huolto/nollaus; EVAP-järjestelmätesti; Pysäytyskuvan tiedot; I/M-valmiuden valvonta; Suuttimen koodaus; Live-tiedot / reaaliaikainen tietovirta; Happianturin testi; Öljyn nollaus; Sisäisen valvonnan testi (Mode 6); Vikakoodien (DTC) lukeminen; SRS-/turvatyynydiagnostiikka; Ohjauskulman kalibrointi (SAS); TPMS-nollaus/sopeutus; Kaasuläpän sopeutus; Vaihteiston diagnostiikka; Muu
cs: Podporované diagnostické funkce: Diagnostika ABS; Test baterie / nabíjecího systému; Obousměrné/aktivní testy; Smazat kódy (DTC); Regenerace DPF; Servis/reset EPB; Test systému EVAP; Data Freeze frame; Monitory připravenosti I/M; Kódování vstřikovačů; Aktuální data / tok dat v reálném čase; Test lambda sondy; Reset intervalu výměny oleje; Integrovaný test monitorování (režim 6); Načíst kódy (DTC); Diagnostika SRS/Airbag; Kalibrace úhlu natočení volantu (SAS); Reset/načtení TPMS; Adaptace škrticí klapky; Diagnostika převodovky; Jiné
pt-BR: Funções de diagnóstico disponíveis: Diagnóstico de ABS; Teste de bateria/sistema de carga; Testes bidirecionais/ativos; Apagar códigos (DTC); Regeneração de DPF; Serviço/redefinição de EPB; Teste do sistema EVAP; Dados de quadro congelado; Monitores de prontidão I/M; Codificação de injetor; Dados em tempo real/fluxo de dados em tempo real; Teste de sensor de O2; Redefinição de óleo; Teste de monitoramento a bordo (Modo 6); Ler códigos (DTC); Diagnóstico de SRS/Airbag; Calibração do ângulo de direção (SAS); Redefinição/aprendizado do TPMS; Reaprendizado do acelerador; Diagnósticos da transmissão; Outra
de: Unterstützte Diagnosefunktionen: ABS-Diagnose; Batterie-/Ladesystemtest; Bidirektionale/aktive Tests; Fehlercodes löschen (DTC); DPF-Regeneration; EPB-Service/Zurücksetzen; EVAP-Systemtest; Freeze-Frame-Daten; I/M-Readiness-Test; Injektor-Codierung; Live-Daten/Echtzeit-Datenstrom; O2-Sensortest; Öl-Reset; On-Board-Diagnosetest (Modus 6); Fehlercodes lesen (DTC); SRS-/Airbag-Diagnose; Lenkwinkelkalibrierung (SAS); RDKS-Reset/Anlernen; Drosselklappen-Anlernen; Getriebediagnose; Sonstige
en: Diagnostic functions supported: ABS diagnostics; Battery/charging system test; Bi-directional/active tests; Clear codes (DTC); DPF regeneration; EPB service/reset; EVAP system test; Freeze frame data; I/M readiness monitors; Injector coding; Live data/real-time data stream; O2 sensor test; Oil reset; On-board monitoring test (Mode 6); Read codes (DTC); SRS/Airbag diagnostics; Steering angle calibration (SAS); TPMS reset/learn; Throttle relearn; Transmission diagnostics; Other
vi: Các chức năng chẩn đoán được hỗ trợ: Chẩn đoán ABS; Kiểm tra hệ thống sạc/pin; Kiểm tra hai chiều/chủ động; Xóa mã lỗi (DTC); Tái tạo DPF; Bảo dưỡng/thiết lập lại EPB; Kiểm tra hệ thống EVAP; Dữ liệu đóng băng; Trạng thái sẵn sàng I/M; Mã hóa kim phun; Dữ liệu trực tiếp/luồng dữ liệu theo thời gian thực; Kiểm tra cảm biến O2; Thiết lập lại dầu; Kiểm tra giám sát trên xe (Chế độ 6); Đọc mã lỗi (DTC); Chẩn đoán SRS/túi khí; Hiệu chuẩn góc lái (SAS); Đặt lại/học TPMS; Học lại bướm ga; Chẩn đoán hộp số; Khác
bg-BG: Поддържани диагностични функции: Диагностика на ABS; Тест на акумулатор/система за зареждане; Двупосочни/активни тестове; Изчистване на кодове (DTC); Регенерация на DPF; Обслужване/нулиране на EPB; Тест на EVAP системата; Данни в стоп кадър; Монитори за готовност I/M; Кодиране на инжектори; Данни на живо/поток от данни в реално време; Тест на O2 сензор; Нулиране на маслото; Мониторингов тест на борда (режим 6); Четене на кодове (DTC); Диагностика на SRS/въздушни възглавници; Калибриране на ъгъла на завиване (SAS); Нулиране/обучение на TPMS; Преобучаване на дроселната клапа; Диагностика на трансмисията; Друго
lt-LT: Palaikomos diagnostikos funkcijos: ABS diagnostika; Akumuliatoriaus / įkrovimo sistemos testas; Dvikrypčiai / aktyvūs testai; Ištrinti kodus (DTC); DPF regeneracija; EPB aptarnavimas / atstatymas; EVAP sistemos testas; Užfiksuotų kadrų duomenys; I/M pasirengimo monitoriai; Purkštukų kodavimas; Tiesioginiai duomenys / realiojo laiko duomenų srautas; O2 jutiklio testas; Alyvos atstatymas; Borto stebėsenos testas (6 režimas); Skaityti kodus (DTC); SRS / oro pagalvių diagnostika; Vairo kampo kalibravimas (SAS); TPMS atstatymas / apmokymas; Droselio apmokymas; Transmisijos diagnostika; Kita
it: Functions diagnostiche supportate: Diagnostica ABS; Test batteria/sistema di ricarica; Test bidirezionali/attivi; Cancellazione codici (DTC); Rigenerazione DPF; Servizio/ripristino EPB; Test sistema EVAP; Dati freeze frame; Monitor stato di prontezza I/M; Codifica iniettori; Dati in tempo reale/flusso di dati in tempo reale; Test sensore O2; Reset olio; Test monitoraggio di bordo (Modalità 6); Lettura codici (DTC); Diagnostica SRS/airbag; Calibrazione angolo di sterzata (SAS); Reset/apprendimento TPMS; Riapprendimento corpo farfallato; Diagnostica trasmissione; Altro
tr: Desteklenen arıza tespit fonksiyonları: ABS arıza tespiti; Akü/şarj sistemi testi; Çift yönlü/aktif testler; Kodları temizle (DTC); DPF rejenerasyonu; EPB servisi/sıfırlaması; EVAP sistemi testi; Anlık hata verisi; I/M hazırlık monitörleri; Enjektör kodlama; Canlı veri/gerçek zamanlı veri akışı; O2 sensörü testi; Yağ sıfırlama; Araç içi izleme testi (Mod 6); Kod okuma (DTC); SRS/Hava yastığı arıza tespiti; Direksiyon açısı kalibrasyonu (SAS); TPMS sıfırlama/tanıtma; Gaz kelebeği adaptasyonu; Şanzıman arıza tespiti; Diğer
sv: Diagnostiska Functions som stöds: ABS-diagnostik; Test av batteri/laddningssystem; Dubbelriktade/aktiva tester; Radera koder (DTC); DPF-regenerering; EPB-service/återställning; Test av EVAP-system; Frysramsdata; I/M-statusövervakare; Spridarkodning; Livedata/dataström i realtid; Test av O2-sensor; Återställning av olja; Inbyggt övervakningstest (Mode 6); Läs koder (DTC); SRS-/krockkuddediagnostik; Kalibrering av styrvinkel (SAS); Återställning/inlärning av TPMS; Ominlärning av gasspjäll; Växellådsdiagnostik; Övrigt
es: Funciones de diagnóstico compatibles: Diagnósticos del ABS; Prueba del sistema de batería/carga; Pruebas bidireccionales/activas; Borrar códigos (DTC); Regeneración del DPF; Servicio/restablecimiento del EPB; Prueba del sistema EVAP; Datos de cuadro congelado; Monitores de preparación I/M; Codificación de inyectores; Datos en vivo/flujo de datos en tiempo real; Prueba del sensor de O2; Restablecimiento de aceite; Prueba de monitoreo a bordo (modo 6); Leer códigos (DTC); Diagnósticos del SRS/bolsas de aire; Calibración del ángulo de dirección (SAS); Reinicio/aprendizaje del TPMS; Reaprendizaje del acelerador; Diagnóstico de transmisión; Otro
nb: Støttede diagnostiske funksjoner: ABS-diagnostikk; Test av batteri/ladesystem; Toveis/aktive tester; Slett koder (DTC); DPF-regenerering; EPB-service/tilbakestilling; EVAP-systemtest; Frysrammedata; I/M-beredskapsmonitorer; Injektorkoding; Live data/sanntids datastrøm; O2-sensortest; Tilbakestilling av olje; Innebygd overvåkingstest (modus 6); Les koder (DTC); SRS/Airbag-diagnostikk; Styrevinkelkalibrering (SAS); Tilbakestilling/innlæring av TPMS; Reinnlæring av gasspjeld; Girkassediagnostikk; Annet
el: Υποστηριζόμενες διαγνωστικές λειτουργίες: Διαγνωστικά ABS; Δοκιμή μπαταρίας/συστήματος φόρτισης; Αμφίδρομες/ενεργές δοκιμές; Διαγραφή κωδικών (DTC); Αναγέννηση DPF; Σέρβις/επαναφορά EPB; Δοκιμή συστήματος EVAP; Δεδομένα freeze frame; Οθόνες ετοιμότητας I/M; Κωδικοποίηση μπεκ; Ζωντανά δεδομένα/ροή δεδομένων σε πραγματικό χρόνο; Δοκιμή αισθητήρα O2; Επαναφορά λαδιού; Δοκιμή ενσωματωμένης παρακολούθησης (Λειτουργία 6); Ανάγνωση κωδικών (DTC); Διαγνωστικά SRS/αερόσακων; Βαθμονόμηση γωνίας διεύθυνσης (SAS); Επαναφορά/Εκμάθηση TPMS; Επαναπρογραμματισμός πεταλούδας; Διαγνωστικός έλεγχος κιβωτίου ταχυτήτων; Άλλο
zh-TW: 支援的診斷功能: ABS 診斷; 電池/充電系統測試; 雙向/主動測試; 清除故障碼 (DTC); DPF 再生; EPB 保養/重設; EVAP 系統測試; 凍結幀資料; I/M 整備狀態監測; 噴油嘴編碼; 即時資料/即時資料流; O2 感測器測試; 機油歸零重設; 車載監測測試 (Mode 6); 讀取故障碼 (DTC); SRS/安全氣囊診斷; 轉向角校正 (SAS); TPMS 重設/學習; 節氣門重新學習; 變速箱診斷; 其他
pl: Obsługiwane funkcje diagnostyczne: Diagnostyka ABS; Test akumulatora/układu ładowania; Testy dwukierunkowe/aktywne; Kasowanie kodów (DTC); Regeneracja DPF; Serwis/resetowanie EPB; Test układu EVAP; Dane z zamrożonych ramek; Monitory gotowości I/M; Kodowanie wtryskiwaczy; Dane na żywo/strumień danych w czasie rzeczywistym; Test sondy lambda; Reset inspekcji olejowej; Test monitorowania pokładowego (Mode 6); Odczyt kodów (DTC); Diagnostyka SRS/Airbag; Kalibracja kąta skrętu kierownicy (SAS); Resetowanie/przyuczanie TPMS; Adaptacja przepustnicy; Diagnostyka skrzyni biegów; Inne
ko: 지원되는 진단 기능: ABS 진단; 배터리/충전 시스템 테스트; 양방향/액티브 테스트; 코드 지우기(DTC); DPF 재생; EPB 서비스/재설정; EVAP 시스템 테스트; 프리즈 프레임 데이터; I/M 준비 모니터; 인젝터 코딩; 라이브 데이터/실시간 데이터 스트림; O2 센서 테스트; 오일 재설정; 온보드 모니터링 테스트(모드 6); 코드 읽기(DTC); SRS/에어백 진단; 조향각 보정(SAS); TPMS 초기화/학습; 스로틀 재학습; 변속기 진단; 기타
da: Understøttede diagnosticeringsfunktioner: ABS-diagnosticering; Test af batteri/opladningssystem; Tovejs/aktive tests; Ryd koder (DTC); DPF-regenerering; EPB-service/nulstilling; EVAP-systemtest; Freeze frame-data; I/M-readiness monitors; Injektorkodning; Live data/realtidsdatastrøm; O2-sensortest; Nulstilling af olie; On-board overvågningstest (Mode 6); Læs koder (DTC); SRS-/airbag-diagnosticering; Kalibrering af styrevinkel (SAS); Nulstilling/indlæring af TPMS; Genindlæring af gasspjæld; Diagnosticering af gearkasse; Andet
hu: Támogatott diagnosztikai funkciók: ABS diagnosztika; Akkumulátor/töltőrendszer-teszt; Kétirányú/aktív tesztek; Hibakódok törlése (DTC); DPF regenerálás; EPB szerviz/visszaállítás; EVAP rendszerteszt; Kimerevített adatok (freeze frame); I/M készenléti monitorok; Befecskendezőkódolás; Élő adatok/valós idejű adatfolyam; O2 szenzorteszt; Olajszerviz-visszaállítás; Fedélzeti megfigyelési teszt (Mode 6); Hibakódok olvasása (DTC); SRS/Légzsák-diagnosztika; Kormányszög-kalibráció (SAS); TPMS visszaállítás/tanulás; Fojtószelep-újratanulás; Sebességváltó-diagnosztika; Egyéb
sk-SK: Podporované diagnostické funkcie: Diagnostika ABS; Test batérie/nabíjacieho systému; Obojsmerné/aktívne testy; Vymazanie kódov (DTC); Regenerácia DPF; Servis/reset EPB; Test systému EVAP; Údaje zmrazených snímok (Freeze frame); Monitory pripravenosti I/M; Kódovanie vstrekovačov; Aktuálne údaje / dátový tok v reálnom čase; Test lambda sondy; Reset oleja; Test palubného monitorovania (Režim 6); Čítanie kódov (DTC); Diagnostika SRS/Airbagov; Kalibrácia uhla natočenia volantu (SAS); Reset/učenie TPMS; Znovunastavenie škrtiacej klapky; Diagnostika prevodovky; Iné
zh-CN: 支持的诊断功能: ABS 诊断; 电池/充电系统测试; 双向/主动测试; 清除代码 (DTC); DPF 再生; EPB 保养/重置; EVAP 系统测试; 冻结帧数据; I/M 准备就绪监视器; 喷油嘴编码; 实时数据/实时数据流; O2 传感器测试; 机油重置; 车载监控测试（模式 6）; 读取代码 (DTC); SRS/安全气囊诊断; 转向角标定 (SAS); TPMS 重置/学习; 节气门重新学习; 变速箱诊断; 其他
ja: サポートされている診断Functions: ABS診断; バッテリー/充電システムテスト; 双方向/アクティブテスト; コード消去 (DTC); DPF再生; EPBサービス/リセット; EVAPシステムテスト; フリーズフレームデータ; I/Mレディネスモニター; インジェクターコーディング; ライブデータ/リアルタイムデータストリーム; O2センサーテスト; オイルリセット; オンボードモニタリングテスト (モード6); コード読み取り (DTC); SRS/エアバッグ診断; ステアリング角キャリブレーション (SAS); TPMSリセット/学習; スロットル再学習; トランスミッション診断; その他
ro-RO: Funcții de diagnosticare acceptate: Diagnosticare ABS; Test baterie/sistem de încărcare; Teste bidirecționale/active; Ștergere coduri (DTC); Regenerare DPF; Service/Resetare EPB; Test sistem EVAP; Date freeze frame; Monitoare de pregătire I/M; Codare injectoare; Date în timp real/flux de date; Test senzor O2; Resetare ulei; Test de monitorizare la bord (Modul 6); Citire coduri (DTC); Diagnosticare SRS/Airbag; Calibrare unghi de bracaj (SAS); Resetare/Învățare TPMS; Reînvățare clapetă de accelerație; Diagnosticare transmisie; Altele
fr: Fonctions de diagnostic prises en charge: Diagnostic ABS; Test de batterie/système de charge; Tests bidirectionnels/actifs; Effacer les codes (DTC); Régénération du FAP; Entretien/réinitialisation de l'EPB; Test du système EVAP; Données d'arrêt sur image; Moniteurs de préparation I/M; Codage d'injecteur; Données en direct/flux de données en temps réel; Test de la sonde lambda (O2); Réinitialisation de la vidange; Test de surveillance embarquée (Mode 6); Lire les codes (DTC); Diagnostic SRS/Airbag; Étalonnage de l’angle de braquage (SAS); Réinitialisation/apprentissage TPMS; Réapprentissage du papillon; Diagnostics de la transmission; Autre
sl-SI: Podprte diagnostične funkcije: Diagnostika ABS; Preizkus baterije/sistema polnjenja; Dvosmerni/aktivni preizkusi; Brisanje kod (DTC); Regeneracija DPF; Servis/ponastavitev EPB; Preizkus sistema EVAP; Podatki zamrznjene slike (Freeze frame); Nadzorniki pripravljenosti I/M; Kodiranje injektorjev; Pretok podatkov v živo/v realnem času; Preizkus senzorja O2; Ponastavitev olja; Preizkus nadzora na vozilu (način 6); Branje kod (DTC); Diagnostika SRS/zračnih blazin; Umerjanje kota krmiljenja (SAS); Ponastavitev/učenje TPMS; Ponovno učenje plina; Diagnostika menjalnika; Drugo
hr-HR: Podržane dijagnostičke funkcije: Dijagnostika ABS-a; Testiranje baterije / sustava punjenja; Dvosmjerni/aktivni testovi; Brisanje kodova (DTC); Regeneracija DPF-a; Servisiranje / ponovno postavljanje EPB-a; Testiranje sustava EVAP; Podaci o zamrznutoj slici (Freeze frame); Monitori spremnosti I/M; Kodiranje injektora; Prijenos podataka uživo / u stvarnom vremenu; Testiranje O2 senzora; Ponovno postavljanje pokazivača ulja; Ugrađeni test praćenja (Način 6); Čitanje kodova (DTC); Dijagnostika SRS-a / zračnih jastuka; Kalibracija kuta upravljača (SAS); Ponovno postavljanje / učenje TPMS-a; Ponovno učenje ventila za gas; Dijagnostika mjenjača; Ostalo
pt-PT: Funções de diagnóstico suportadas: Diagnóstico de ABS; Teste de bateria/sistema de carregamento; Testes bidirecionais/ativos; Limpar códigos (DTC); Regeneração do DPF; Serviço/reposição do EPB; Teste ao sistema EVAP; Dados freeze frame; Monitores de prontidão I/M; Codificação de injetores; Dados em tempo real/fluxo de dados em tempo real; Teste ao sensor de O2; Reposição do óleo; Teste de monitorização a bordo (Modo 6); Ler códigos (DTC); Diagnóstico de SRS/airbags; Calibração do ângulo da direção (SAS); Reposição/aprendizagem do TPMS; Reaprendizagem do acelerador; Diagnóstico da transmissão; Outro